Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Chapter 05. Alaska Public Utilities Regulatory Act.

Cross references. —

For a temporary provision tolling deadlines for statutory and regulatory action by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska during the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared on March 11, 2020, see § 18, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

For a temporary moratorium on disconnection of residential utility service during the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared on March 11, 2020, for a customer who shows financial hardship and enters into a deferred payment agreement with the utility, see § 19, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

For a temporary provision providing that a utility certificated under AS 42.05 may record regulatory assets, to be recovered through future rates, for uncollectable residential utility bills and extraordinary expenses that result from the novel coronavirus disease (COVID-19) public health disaster emergency declared by the governor on March 11, 2020, see § 20, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For regulatory commission of Alaska, see 3 AAC, part 7.

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

Collateral references. —

Robert L. Hahne, Accounting for Public Utilities, (Matthew Bender).